Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3208
Violation of act; liability for damages.

Any person who violates the Automatic License Plate Reader Privacy Act shall be liable for damages that proximately cause injury to the business, person, or reputation of another individual or entity.

Laws 2018, LB93, § 8.